Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE D. DENTISTRY

CHAPTER 252. STATE BOARD OF DENTAL EXAMINERS

Sec. 252.001. BOARD MEMBERSHIP. (a) The State Board of Dental Examiners consists of 11 members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate as follows:

(1) six reputable dentist members who reside in this state and have been actively engaged in the practice of dentistry for at least the five years preceding appointment;

(2) three reputable dental hygienist members who reside in this state and have been actively engaged in the practice of dental hygiene for at least the five years preceding appointment; and

(3) two members who represent the public.

(b) Appointments to the board shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

(c) In making an appointment under this section, the governor shall attempt to appoint members of different minority groups, including females, African Americans, Hispanic Americans, Native Americans, and Asian Americans.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 8.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 252.002. MEMBER ELIGIBILITY. (a) A person is not eligible for appointment as a member if:

(1) the person's license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene has been revoked by the board for a violation of a statute of this state relating to the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene and the revocation is not overturned by final order of a court; or

(2) the person is an adverse party in civil litigation against the board.

(b) A person is not eligible for appointment as a dentist or dental hygienist member of the board if the person has a financial interest in any dental, dental hygiene, or medical school.

(c) A person is not eligible for appointment as a dental hygienist member of the board if the person is licensed to practice dentistry in this state.

(d) A person is not eligible for appointment as a public member of the board if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is registered, certified, or licensed by an occupational regulatory agency in the field of health care;

(2) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the board;

(3) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the board;

(4) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or money from the board, other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for board membership, attendance, or expenses; or

(5) is employed by a board member.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 772 (S.B. 887), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.003. MEMBERSHIP AND EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS. (a) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined statewide association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interest.

(b) A person may not be a member of the board and may not be a board employee employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.) if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of health care.

(c) A person may not serve as a member of the board or act as the general counsel to the board if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.072(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 252.004. TERMS OF OFFICE. (a) Members of the board serve staggered six-year terms. The terms of one-third of the members expire February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) A member may not serve more than two consecutive full terms. The completion of the unexpired portion of a term does not constitute service for a full term for purposes of this subsection.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 772 (S.B. 887), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 252.005. PRIVILEGES OF OFFICE. Members of the board have full and identical privileges, except that only dentist members may participate in the decision to pass or fail an applicant for a license to practice dentistry during the clinical portion of the board examinations.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 252.006. OFFICERS. (a) The board shall elect a secretary from its members to serve for a one-year term.

(b) The governor shall designate a member of the board as the presiding officer of the board to serve in that capacity at the will of the governor. The presiding officer must be a dentist.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 252.007. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL. (a) It is a ground for removal from the board that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of appointment the qualifications required by Sections 252.001 and 252.002;

(2) does not maintain during the service on the board the qualifications required by Sections 252.001 and 252.002;

(3) is ineligible for membership under Section 252.003;

(4) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(5) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled board meetings the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year without an excuse approved by a majority vote of the board.

(b) The validity of an action of the board is not affected by the fact that the action is taken when a ground for removal of a board member exists.

(c) If the executive director has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the executive director shall notify the presiding officer of the board of the potential ground. The presiding officer shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists. If the potential ground for removal involves the presiding officer, the executive director shall notify the next highest ranking officer of the board, who shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 252.008. PER DIEM; REIMBURSEMENT. (a) Each board member is entitled to a per diem set by legislative appropriation for each day the member engages in board business.

(b) A board member may receive reimbursement for travel expenses, including expenses for meals and lodging, incurred in performing an official duty as prescribed by the General Appropriations Act.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 252.009. MEETINGS. The board shall hold meetings at least twice a year at times and places the board determines are most convenient for applicants for examination.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1249, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 252.010. BOARD MEMBER TRAINING. (a) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the board may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the board until the person completes a training program that complies with this section.

(b) The training program must provide the person with information regarding:

(1) the law governing board operations;

(2) the programs, functions, rules, and budget of the board;

(3) the scope of and limitations on the rulemaking authority of the board;

(4) the types of board rules, interpretations, and enforcement actions that may implicate federal antitrust law by limiting competition or impacting prices charged by persons engaged in a profession or business the board regulates, including rules, interpretations, and enforcement actions that:

(A) regulate the scope of practice of persons in a profession or business the board regulates;

(B) restrict advertising by persons in a profession or business the board regulates;

(C) affect the price of goods or services provided by persons in a profession or business the board regulates; and

(D) restrict participation in a profession or business the board regulates;

(5) the results of the most recent formal audit of the board;

(6) the requirements of:

(A) laws relating to open meetings, public information, administrative procedure, and disclosure of conflicts of interest; and

(B) other laws applicable to members of the board in performing their duties; and

(7) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the board or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the board is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

(d) The executive director shall create a training manual that includes the information required by Subsection (b). The executive director shall distribute a copy of the training manual annually to each board member. On receipt of the training manual, each board member shall sign and submit to the executive director a statement acknowledging receipt of the training manual.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 17, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 295 (S.B. 313), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 252.011. OATH OF OFFICE. Before assuming the duties of office, each board member shall file with the secretary of state a copy of the constitutional oath of office taken by the member.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.